Maryland, session 2025, SB0109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 5–816 through 5–820 of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 5–817 through 5–821, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – General Provisions
– 1 –

Ch. 299 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated unless:
(1) the context clearly requires a different meaning; or
(2) a different definition is adopted for a particular provision.
(jj) “School board” means a county board of education [or, in] AND INCLUDES
THE Baltimore [City, the] CITY Board of School Commissioners.
5–816.
ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1 EACH YEAR, EACH SCHOOL BOARD SHALL CERTIFY
TO THE ETHICS COMMISSION THAT THE SCHOOL BOARD IS IN COMPLIANCE WITH
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS PART FOR:
(1) MEMBERS OF THE SCHOOL BOARD; AND
(2) IF APPLICABLE, OFFICIALS AND EMPLOYEES OF THE LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –